Massachusetts, session 194th, H2879.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any general or special
law to the contrary, Steven A. Hilliger, Firefighter of the fire department of the town of
Lancaster, may continue to serve in that position until reaching age 70, the date of his retirement
or until the date he is relieved of his duties by the Fire Chief, whichever occurs first; provided,
however, that he is mentally and physically capable of performing the duties of his office. The
Select Board of the town of Lancaster, at its own expense, may require Steven A. Hilliger to be
examined by an impartial physician designated by the board to determine his mental and physical
capability. No further deductions shall be made from regular compensation of Steven A. Hilliger
under chapter 32 of the General Laws for any service performed subsequent to reaching the age
of 65. Upon his retirement, he shall receive a superannuation retirement allowance equal to that
which he would have been entitled had he retired upon reaching the age of 65, if any.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 2